New York, session 2025-2026, S9235.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 668-e of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. Severely and permanently disabled. For the purposes of this 4 section, an individual is severely and permanently disabled when a 5 doctor of medicine or osteopathy, licensed to practice in a state, has 6 determined that such person is either: 7 a. unable to engage in any occupation for substantial gainful activity 8 due to a physical or mental impairment; or 9 b. unable to engage in any occupation for remuneration or profit due 10 to a physical or mental impairment. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13771-01-5